Washington statutes.
RCW 35.48.060

Procedure governed by ordinance.

All actions of a city or town respecting the purchase of bonds and warrants or sales of bonds, warrants or assets of the revolving fund shall be as directed by general or special ordinance.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.48.060. Prior: 1943 c 244 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9351-16.]